Utah statutes.
4-37-203.   Transportation of aquatic animals to or from aquaculture
facilities.
(1)  Any person holding a certificate of registration for an aquaculture
facility may transport the live aquatic animals specified on the certificate
of registration to the facility or to any person who has been issued a
certificate of registration to possess those aquatic animals.
(2)  Each transfer or shipment of live aquatic animals from or to an
aquaculture facility within the state must be accompanied by documentation of
the source and destination of the fish, including:
(a)  name, address, certificate of registration number and health approval
number of the source;
(b)  number and weight being shipped, by species; and
(c)  name, address, and certificate of registration number of the destination.
